Connecticut, session 2026, HB05462.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, "solar
photovoltaic noise barrier" means a structure constructed between a
highway and adjacent property that incorporates solar photovoltaic
technology designed to generate electricity and provide highway noise
mitigation.
(b) The Commissioner of Transportation shall establish a solar
photovoltaic noise barrier pilot program for the purpose of evaluating
the feasibility, cost-effectiveness, environmental benefits and
effectiveness of integrating solar photovoltaic technology into noise
barriers located alongside state highways. The pilot program shall
include the design, installation, operation, maintenance and evaluation
of at least one, but not more than three, solar photovoltaic noise barriers.
The commissioner may enter into agreements with third parties for the
design, installation, operation or maintenance, or any combination
sHB5462 / File No. 388 1

sHB5462 File No. 388
thereof, of solar photovoltaic noise barriers. The commissioner shall
consult with the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority regarding electric
interconnection and net metering eligibility.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, the commissioner shall submit a
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to transportation. Such report
shall include information concerning the total costs of the pilot program;
electricity generation data; maintenance and performance, safety and
structural findings; environmental impacts and any recommendation
for the continuation, expansion or modification of the pilot program.
Sec. 2. Section 14-80 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Each motor vehicle and the devices on such vehicle shall be
operated, equipped, constructed and adjusted to prevent unnecessary
or unusual noise.
(b) (1) Each motor vehicle operated by an internal combustion engine
shall be equipped, except as hereinafter provided, with a muffler or
mufflers designed to prevent excessive, unusual or unnecessary exhaust
noise. The muffler or mufflers shall be maintained by the owner in good
working order and shall be in use whenever the motor vehicle is
operated.
(2) No person, including a motor vehicle dealer or repairer or a
motorcycle dealer, shall install, and no person shall use, on a motor
vehicle, a muffler or mufflers lacking interior baffle plates or other
effective muffling devices, a gutted muffler, a muffler cutout or a
straight exhaust except when the motor vehicle is operated in a race,
contest or demonstration of speed or skill as a public exhibition
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 14-164a, or any mechanical device
which will amplify the noise emitted by the vehicle.
(3) No person, including a motor vehicle dealer or repairer or a
sHB5462 / File No. 388 2

sHB5462 File No. 388
motorcycle dealer, shall remove all or part of any muffler on a motor
vehicle except to repair or replace the muffler or part for the more
effective prevention of noise.
(4) No person shall use on the exhaust system or tail pipe of a motor
vehicle any extension or device which will cause excessive or unusual
noise.
(c) The engine of every motor vehicle shall be equipped and adjusted
to prevent excessive fumes or exhaust smoke.
(d) All pipes carrying exhaust gases from the motor shall be
constructed of, and maintained with, leak-proof metal. Exhaust pipes
shall be directed from the muffler or mufflers toward the rear of the
vehicle and shall be approximately parallel with the longitudinal axis of
the vehicle and approximately parallel to the surface of the roadway, or
shall be directed from the muffler upward to a location above the cab or
body of the vehicle so that fumes, gases and smoke are directed away
from the occupants of the vehicle. Exhaust pipes on a passenger vehicle
shall extend to the extreme rear end of the vehicle's body, not including
the bumper and its attachments to the body, or shall be attached to the
vehicle in such a way that the exhaust pipes direct the exhaust gases to
either side of the vehicle ensuring that fresh ambient air is located under
the vehicle at all times. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to establish
safety standards for passenger vehicles equipped with exhaust pipes
located in front of the rear axle.
(e) Every motor vehicle shall, when operated on a highway, be
equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting
sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than
two hundred feet, but no horn or other warning device shall emit an
unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle.
(f) (1) No vehicle shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use on
a vehicle, any siren, whistle or bell as a warning signal device, except as
otherwise permitted by this section.
sHB5462 / File No. 388 3

sHB5462 File No. 388
(2) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal
device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an
ordinary warning signal.
(3) Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren,
whistle or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal
conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred feet and of a
type approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles. Such signal shall
not be used unless the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency
call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the
law, in which event the driver of the vehicle shall sound the signal when
reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the
approach of the vehicle.
(g) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
fined one [hundred fifty] thousand dollars for each offense.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-80
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b), "performance" was changed to "effectiveness" for clarity.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5462 / File No. 388 4

sHB5462 File No. 388
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Transportation TF - Cost See Below See Below
State Revenues GF&TF - See Below See Below
Revenue Gain
Note: TF=Transportation Fund; GF&TF=General Fund & Transportation Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
Section 1 results in costs to the Department of Transportation (DOT)
by requiring the agency to establish a solar photovoltaic noise barrier
pilot program, which must include the design, installation, operation,
maintenance and evaluation of at least one and no more than three
barriers.
Costs to establish the pilot program will depend on implementation
decisions made by DOT and available funding but could reasonably
include the following: (1) approximately $500,000 annually in
consultant and/or staff costs to manage the pilot, including costs for
planning, researching, training, evaluation, and reporting, (2) a detailed
technical noise study at each site, costing approximately $100,000 per
site, (3) construction and installation of the barriers themselves which,
according to preliminary DOT research, could be approximately $3
million per mile,1 and (4) ongoing maintenance costs particular to these
Costs for solar photovoltaic noise barriers are difficult to estimate because this
technology is not yet widely used on the U.S. highway system and costs are expected
to vary based on local conditions. For context, traditional noise barrier project costs are
approximately $2 million per mile in Connecticut.
sHB5462 / File No. 388 5

sHB5462 File No. 388
barriers, such as more complex vegetative management.
The bill also allows DOT to enter into agreements with third parties
for this work which may limit the upfront costs to the state depending
on the terms and scope of any agreement.
Section 2 increases the fine, from $150 per offense to $1,000 per
offense, for certain noise-related motor vehicle violations, resulting in
revenue gain from fines.2
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the timing and scope of the pilot,
ongoing maintenance costs, the terms of any third-party agreement, and
the number of offenses.
Between FY 22 and FY 25, there were a total of 1,557 offenses recorded and $131,000
in fines collected under CGS § 14-80.
sHB5462 / File No. 388 6

sHB5462 File No. 388
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5462
AN ACT CONCERNING NOISE POLLUTION.